Florida, session 2026, HB783.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 394.45735, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 783 2026
394.45735 Coordinated Access Model Pilot Program.—
(1) The Department of Children and Families shall contract
with an entity to establish and operate a behavioral health
Coordinated Access Model Pilot Program in the department's
Northeast Region, including Clay, Duval, and St. Johns Counties,
to improve timely access to behavioral health services using a
single point of entry. The department must:
(a) Award the contract to the selected entity no later
than December 1, 2026.
(b) Include contractual provisions to ensure:
1. Any data created, processed, or maintained under the
contract is portable and can be extracted in a machine-readable
format upon request.
2. The entity will provide, upon request, comprehensive
operational documentation sufficient to allow continued
operation and maintenance by the agency or a new entity.
3. The entity will provide, upon request, reasonable
assistance and support during a transition to the agency or to a
new entity.
4. All anticipated software license fees, license renewal
fees, and operation and maintenance costs are documented in
detail. If exact figures are not feasible, the entity must
provide a reasonable cost range.
(2) The contracted entity must have experience in all of
the following:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 783 2026
(a) Building resource networks, including behavioral
health providers, community-based organizations, and government
and social services.
(b) Connecting individuals requesting assistance with
resources through a coordinated care network.
(c) Hosting a platform that supports closed-loop referrals
and extensive program metrics.
(3) The contracted entity shall subcontract with a state
university that is not designated as a preeminent or emerging
preeminent state research university pursuant to s. 1001.7065(3)
to provide allied health staff and undergraduate and graduate
social work and health professions training and internship
experiences to interact with and screen individuals contacting
the network access point for assistance.
(4) The department and the contracted entity shall create
a coordinated access model which shall:
(a) Coordinate access to behavioral health services among
multiple service providers and social service entities for
individuals requesting assistance.
(b) Provide timely referral, provider navigation, and
connection to appropriate levels of care using a single,
electronic referral and resource platform capable of
coordinating among multiple providers.
(5) The coordinated access model must include, at a
minimum:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 783 2026
(a) A network access point available during standard
business hours with options for telephone, web-based, and in-
person intakes.
(b) Standardized screening and referral tools to identify
service needs and eligibility for available programs.
(c) Referral coordination and warm handoffs to providers,
including scheduling of first appointments and followup
confirmation.
(d) Navigation and followup support to ensure successful
engagement with referred services.
(e) Service directory and inventory of community-based
providers, maintained in real time to the extent practicable.
(f) Coordination with community systems, including primary
care providers, schools, social services, and local governments.
(g) Cultural and linguistic competence to ensure equitable
access to the county population.
(h) Use of a data platform that enables standardized data
collection and reporting on referral outcomes, timeliness of
service connections, consumer experience, and identification of
service system gaps. The data platform must:
1. Support the potential integration with other state and
local data systems, including, but not limited to, Medicaid,
managing entities, school-based services, and community health
systems.
100 2. Facilitate data sharing and interoperability in
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 783 2026
101 compliance with applicable state and federal privacy laws,
102 including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
103 Act of 1996 and 42 C.F.R. part 2.
104 3. Provide a comprehensive view of service utilization and
105 coordination across providers, payors, and community partners.
106 4. Enable the department to evaluate system performance,
107 identify barriers, and inform future resource allocation.
108 (6) The coordinated access model shall include measurable
109 performance outcomes, including, but not limited to:
110 (a) Timeliness of referrals and service connections.
111 (b) Successful engagement rates with referred services.
112 (c) Reduction in duplication of intake assessments.
113 (d) Improved consumer and family satisfaction.
114 (7)(a) Until the program is fully implemented, the
115 department shall provide reports of the status of the
116 Coordinated Access Model Pilot Program quarterly to the
117 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
118 House of Representatives.
119 (b) By November 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
120 department shall assess the effectiveness of the pilot program
121 and submit a report to the Governor, the President of the
122 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
123 (8) The department and the contracted entity may apply for
124 and use any funds from private, state, and federal grants to
125 support or expand Coordinated Access Models.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 783 2026
126 (9) The department may adopt rules to administer this
127 section.
128 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb783-02-c2